Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INVESTIGATIVE SPECIALIST GRANT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the investigative specialist grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must issue grants to law enforcement agencies as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), for the purpose of hiring, training, and retaining investigative specialists to increase the rate at which agencies clear offenses and improve support for victims of crime. The commissioner may award up to $250,000 to an individual applicant. In issuing grants under this section, the commissioner must prioritize law enforcement agencies that: new text end new text begin (1) have a disproportionately high rate of unsolved crimes; new text end new text begin (2) identify inadequate staffing as a major impediment to solving crimes; new text end new text begin (3) present a plan to utilize investigative specialists to increase the number of crimes that are solved; new text end new text begin (4) present other evidence of a commitment to increase the rate of crimes solved by the agency; and new text end new text begin (5) identify specific goals and performance metrics to measure the effectiveness of investigative specialists. new text end new text begin (c) Grant recipients must use grant money to: new text end new text begin (1) create recruiting protocols and a job description for investigative specialists; new text end new text begin (2) create a procedure manual for investigative specialists; new text end new text begin (3) hire investigative specialists; new text end new text begin (4) create training programs for investigative specialists and train individuals hired to be investigative specialists; and new text end new text begin (5) supervise and support investigative specialists. new text end new text begin (d) Investigative specialists hired under this program must provide administrative and investigative support to detectives and investigative supervisors. Grant recipients must provide training to investigative specialists, including training on confidentiality requirements and other relevant policies and procedures. new text end new text begin (e) An investigative specialist hired under this program must not be a peace officer as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); must not identify as a peace officer; and must not exercise powers and duties assigned exclusively to peace officers. new text end new text begin (f) Grant recipients must submit a report to the commissioner of public safety on the use of investigative specialists to improve the rate of crimes solved by the agency. Reports must be made six months after the commissioner awards a grant to the agency and at the end of the grant period. At a minimum, reports must identify: new text end new text begin (1) the number of investigative specialists hired by the agency; new text end new text begin (2) a description of the training provided to investigative specialists; new text end new text begin (3) a summary of the acts performed by investigative specialists; and new text end new text begin (4) a description of the impact the investigative specialists had on solving crimes. new text end